Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. State Publications.

Sec. 44.99.200.
Production of publications.

The publications of a state agency shall be produced at a private sector facility located in the state when practicable. The Department of Administration shall establish standards for the production of publications by state agencies, except that the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska shall establish the standards for the university. The standards shall be designed to promote simplicity, low cost, and consistency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 88 SLA 1991; am § 140 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.99.130. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 44.99.205.
Use of pictures and messages.

A state agency may not place a picture of an elected state official on an application form, a warrant, or a direct deposit notice provided by the agency.

A state agency may not place a message on or with an application form, a warrant, or a direct deposit notice provided by the agency unless the message is

from a state agency employee who is not an elected state official; and

required by law, necessary for the operation of the document, related to seasonal health issues including flu shot reminders, or related to a program or activity of a state agency.

In this section,

“direct deposit notice” means a written notice that a deposit has been made by the state agency;

“elected state official” means the governor, the lieutenant governor, a lieutenant governor who serves as acting governor or who succeeds to the office of the governor, or a legislator, including a person who has been appointed a member of the legislature by the governor to fill a vacancy in the legislature;

“program” includes the permanent fund dividend program under AS 43.23 and the longevity bonus program under AS 47.45;

“state agency” has the meaning given in AS

44.99.240

(2)(A) and (B).

History.

(§ 1 ch 25 SLA 1998)

Sec. 44.99.210.
Disclosures on publication.

If the actual annual costs for a publication of a state agency that are paid from the general fund exceed $1,500, or if the actual annual costs of a state agency publication that is a report required by law are paid from a source other than the general fund and exceed $1,500, the publication must include a statement that gives the name of the agency releasing the publication, the purpose of the publication, the cost for each copy of the publication, and the city and state where the printing was done. The statement must read: “This publication was released by... (name of state agency)..., produced at a cost of $..... per copy to... (statement of purpose)..., and printed in...... (city and state where printed).” If the publication is required by law, the statement must also include: “This publication is required by... (appropriate citation to Alaska law).” The statement may include, if applicable, a declaration of the revenue raised by the sale of the publication or from the purchase of advertising in the publication. The statement shall be printed in one conspicuous place in the body of the publication in a type size that is not smaller than 12 points and shall be placed in a box composed of at least two point rule. In this section, “cost for each copy” means the figure that results after dividing the total contract cost of producing the publication by the number of copies produced. This section does not apply to a publication that is intended primarily for foreign or other out-of-state use, to a program for a public ceremony of a state agency, or to materials used by a state agency to develop a market for the agency’s services or products.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 59 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.99.140. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 44.99.220.
List of publications.

A state agency shall compile and maintain a list of the publications that it produces each fiscal year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.99.150. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 44.99.230.
Standards. [Repealed, § 7 ch 59 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 44.99.240.
Definitions.

In AS

44.99.200

—

44.99.240

,

“publication” means a written document, including books, brochures, flyers, manuals, newsletters, pamphlets, programs, reports, and similar documents, but does not include standard forms, letterhead stationery, letterhead envelopes, election ballots, construction plans and specifications, location and design study reports, the Alaska Statutes, the Alaska Administrative Code, the Alaska Rules of Court, publications produced by the University of Alaska press, and papers that are submitted to a publisher, including a publisher of journals and anthologies, that is not a state agency;

“state agency” means

a department, institution, board, commission, division, authority, public corporation, or other administrative unit of the executive branch, including the University of Alaska and the Alaska Railroad Corporation;

a committee, division, or administrative unit of the legislative branch, including the Alaska Legislative Council, the leadership of each house, the office of victims’ rights, and the office of the ombudsman;

an administrative unit of the judicial branch, including the Alaska Judicial Council and the Commission on Judicial Conduct.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1990; am § 33 ch 92 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.99.170. Renumbered in 1990.